Maryland, session 2025, HB1115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1115*

HOUSE BILL 1115
20–120.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Maryland Pediatric Cancer Fund established under
this section.
(3) “Pediatric cancer research” includes research to develop and advance
the understanding of pediatric cancer and the techniques and modalities effective in the
prevention, cure, screening, and treatment of pediatric cancer.
(b) (1) There is a Maryland Pediatric Cancer Fund.
(2) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; [and]
(II) MONEY FROM THE CIGARETTE RESTITUTION FUND
APPROPRIATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–317 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
[(ii)] (III) Any donations or other money from any other source
accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Fund shall be used only for pediatric cancer research and
administrative expenses as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(5) The Fund shall be maintained for the purposes stated in this section
and unspent portions of the Fund shall remain in the Fund and may not revert to the
General Fund of the State.
(6) Money expended from the Fund for pediatric cancer research is
supplemental and is not intended to take the place of funding that would otherwise be
appropriated to the Department for pediatric cancer research.
(7) All expenditures from the Fund shall be made only in accordance with
an appropriation approved by the General Assembly in the annual State budget or through
an approved budget amendment under §§ 7–209 and 7–210 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(8) [(i)] For fiscal year [2023] 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of
$5,000,000 to the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1115 3
[(ii) If $5,000,000 is not included in the annual budget bill for fiscal
year 2023, then the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill for fiscal year 2024 an
appropriation of $5,000,000 to the Fund.]
(c) (1) (i) Each year, the Secretary may:
1. Distribute funds from the Fund to a promotional account
to be allocated to a State–based childhood cancer organization to be used to promote further
donations to the Fund and to educate the State scientific community about the
opportunities for childhood cancer research through the Fund; and
2. Use funds from the Fund to administer the Fund,
including for staff and administrative costs associated with the Commission established
under § 20–121 of this title.
(ii) The amounts distributed and used under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph may not exceed a total of 5% of the Fund.
(2) (i) After making the distribution allowed under paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the Secretary shall use the remainder of the Fund only to provide grants
to eligible physicians, hospitals, laboratories, educational institutions, and other
organizations and persons to conduct pediatric cancer research.
(ii) Money received from the grant program under this section may
not be used to pay for institutional overhead expenses, organizational expenses, or charges
that are not directly related to pediatric cancer research or expenses arising from
community–based support services.
(d) (1) On or before August 31 each year, the Secretary shall submit a report
to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
the administration of the Fund.
(2) The report required under this subsection shall include:
(i) A description of promotional efforts undertaken with money from
the Fund; and
(ii) A detailed accounting of the use of the Fund.
(e) The Secretary shall adopt regulations to implement a pediatric cancer grant
program under this section.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–317.

HOUSE BILL 1115
(a) There is a Cigarette Restitution Fund.
(f) (1) The Cigarette Restitution Fund shall be used to fund:
(i) the Tobacco Use Prevention and Cessation Program established
under Title 13, Subtitle 10 of the Health – General Article;
(ii) the Cancer Prevention, Education, Screening, and Treatment
Program established under Title 13, Subtitle 11 of the Health – General Article;
(iii) the activities of the Southern Maryland Agricultural
Development Commission, in accordance with § 13–611 of the Economic Development
Article;
(iv) for each of fiscal years 2025 through 2029, the Maryland
Community Health Resources Commission Fund, in accordance with subsection (g) of this
section; [and]
(V) THE MARYLAND PEDIATRIC CANCER FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 20–120 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION; AND
[(v)] (VI) other programs that serve the following purposes:
1. reduction of the use of tobacco products by individuals
under the age of 21 years;
2. implementation of the Southern Maryland Regional
Strategy–Action Plan for Agriculture adopted by the Tri–County Council for Southern
Maryland with an emphasis on alternative crop uses for agricultural land now used for
growing tobacco;
3. public and school education campaigns to decrease tobacco
use with initial emphasis on areas targeted by tobacco manufacturers in marketing and
promoting cigarette and tobacco products;
4. smoking cessation programs;
5. enforcement of the laws regarding tobacco sales;
6. the purposes of the Maryland Health Care Foundation
under Title 20, Subtitle 5 of the Health – General Article;
7. primary health care in rural areas of the State and areas
targeted by tobacco manufacturers in marketing and promoting cigarette and tobacco
products;

HOUSE BILL 1115 5
8. prevention, treatment, and research concerning cancer,
heart disease, lung disease, tobacco product use, and tobacco control, including operating
costs and related capital projects;
9. substance abuse treatment and prevention programs; and
10. any other public purpose.
(g) (1) Amounts may only be expended from the Fund through appropriations
in the State budget bill as provided in this subsection.
(2) The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill appropriations
from the Fund equivalent to the lesser of $100,000,000 or 90% of the funds estimated to be
available to the Fund in the fiscal year for which the appropriations are made.
(3) For each fiscal year for which appropriations are made, at least 50% of
the appropriations shall be made for those purposes enumerated in subsection (f)(1)(i), (ii),
and [(v)1] (VI)1 through 9 of this section subject to the requirement of subsection (e)(2) of
this section.
(4) For each fiscal year for which appropriations are made, at least 30% of
the appropriations shall be made for the purposes of the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(5) For each fiscal year for which appropriations are made, 0.15% of the
Fund shall be appropriated for the purposes of enforcement of Title 16, Subtitle 5 of the
Business Regulation Article.
(6) For each of fiscal years 2025 through 2029, the Governor shall include
in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $8,000,000 to the Maryland Community
Health Resources Commission Fund.
(7) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF UP TO $5,000,000 TO THE MARYLAND PEDIATRIC CANCER FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 20–120 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(8) Any additional appropriations, not subject to [paragraph (3), paragraph
(4), or] paragraph (3), (4), OR (5) of this subsection, may be made for any lawful purpose.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.